Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 14-127 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Department of Transportation is authorized to increase any
oversize- or overweight-related permit fees found in its
administrative rules including, but not limited to:
1. Special Over-height Trailer Permit for Limited Travel
thirty-day permit;
2. Longer Combination Vehicle Annual Permit; and
3. Special Over-height Trailer Permit for Limited Travel Annual
Permit.
The Department shall use a formula for calculating the changes
to the fees using a cost-of-living adjustment through the year 2024.
When collecting the fees authorized under the provisions of this
section, the Department shall deposit the amount of the difference
between the fees as of the effective date of this act and the
increased fees authorized by this section to the credit of the
Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 2

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 14-103, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 116, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 14-103), is amended to read as follows:
Section 14-103. A. Except as otherwise provided for by this
chapter, no vehicle, with or without load, shall have a total
outside width in excess of one hundred two (102) inches excluding:
1. Tire bulge;
2. Approved safety devices;
3. A retracted awning with a width of eight (8) inches or less
or other appurtenance of four (4) inches or less which is attached
to the side of a recreational vehicle, as defined in Section 1102 of
this title; and
4. Pins used as a safety precaution or as a load-assisting
device if the pins do not extend the overall width of the vehicle
beyond nine (9) feet. The State of Oklahoma hereby declares it has
determined, in accordance with 23 C.F.R., Section 658.15, that such
pins are necessary for the safe and efficient operation of motor
vehicles.
The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any person
engaged in the hauling of round baled hay with a total outside width
of eleven (11) feet or less when the hay is owned by such person and
is being hauled for any purpose other than resale. The provisions
of this subsection shall also not apply to any county official or
employee engaged in the hauling or pulling of a trailer or equipment
owned by the county on the county roads of such county.
B. Except as otherwise provided for by this chapter:
1. No vehicle, with or without load, shall exceed a height of
thirteen and one-half (13 1/2) feet on any county road, or fourteen
(14) feet on any turnpike, interstate, U.S. or state highway, unless
a greater height is authorized by a special permit issued by the
Executive Director of the Department of Transportation or an
authorized representative of the Department of Transportation
specifying the highways to be used, consistent with public
convenience and safety. The prohibitions on movement as prescribed
in subsection F of Section 14-101 of this title and paragraph 1 of
subsection G of Section 14-101 of this title shall not apply to
vehicles operated pursuant to such permits;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 3

2. An official state bridge vertical clearance map providing
clearance heights as posted for bridges on the interstate, U.S. and
state highway systems shall be available on the Oklahoma Department
of Transportation website; and
3. Operators and owners of vehicles which exceed or have loads
which exceed thirteen and one-half (13 1/2) feet shall be held
liable for all damages to any part of structures spanning the
highway or damages suffered by other affected parties caused by the
vehicle or load exceeding the posted height.
C. Except as otherwise provided for by this chapter:
1. No single truck, with or without load, shall have an overall
length, inclusive of front and rear bumpers, in excess of forty-five
(45) feet;
2. No single bus, with or without load, shall have an overall
length, inclusive of front and rear bumpers, in excess of forty-five
(45) feet;
3. a. On the National Network of Highways which includes the
National System of Interstate and Defense Highways and
four-lane divided Federal Aid Primary System Highways,
no semitrailer operating in a truck-
tractor/semitrailer combination shall have a length
greater than fifty-three (53) feet, except as provided
in subsection C of Section 14-118 of this title which
shall apply to semitrailers exceeding fifty-three (53)
feet but not exceeding fifty-nine (59) feet six (6)
inches. On the National System of Interstate and
Defense Highways and four-lane divided Federal Aid
Primary System Highways, no semitrailer or trailer
operating in a truck-tractor/semitrailer and trailer
combination shall have a length greater than fifty-
three (53) feet;
b. On roads and highways not a part of the National
System of Interstate and Defense Highways or four-lane
divided Federal Aid Primary System Highways, no
semitrailer operating in a truck-tractor/semitrailer
combination shall have a length greater than fifty-
three (53) feet and no semitrailer or trailer
operating in a truck-tractor/semitrailer and trailer
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 4

combination shall have a length greater than twenty-
nine (29) feet. Except as provided for in subsection
D of Section 14-118 of this title, no other
combination of vehicles shall have an overall length,
inclusive of front and rear bumpers, in excess of
seventy (70) feet on all roads and highways. For the
purposes of this paragraph, oil field rig-up trucks
shall be considered to be truck-tractors, when towing
a trailer or semitrailer;
c. On the National Network of Highways the overall length
limitation of a towaway trailer transporter
combination may exceed length restrictions up to
eighty-two (82) feet; and
d. As used in this section:
(1) The the term “trailer transporter towing unit”
shall mean a power unit that is not used to carry
property when operating in a towaway trailer
transporter combination, and
(2) The the term “towaway trailer transporter
combination” shall mean a combination of vehicles
consisting of a trailer transporter towing unit
and two (2) trailers or semitrailers with a total
weight that does not exceed twenty-six thousand
(26,000) pounds; and in which the trailers or
semitrailers carry no property and constitute
inventory property of a manufacturer, distributor
or dealer of such trailers or semitrailers;
4. No combination of vehicles shall consist of more than two
units, except:
a. one truck and semitrailer or truck-tractor/semitrailer
combination may tow one complete trailer or
semitrailer, or
b. vans, suburbans, blazers or other similar types of
vehicles and self-propelled recreational vehicles with
a three-quarter (3/4) ton or more rated capacity may
tow a semitrailer and one complete trailer or
semitrailer for recreational purposes only, provided
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 5

the overall length, inclusive of the front and rear
bumpers, does not exceed sixty-five (65) feet;
5. Poles and gas lines used to maintain public utility
services, not to include new construction, may be moved during
daylight hours, and during nighttime hours only in an emergency,
subject to traffic and road restrictions promulgated by the
Executive Director of the Department of Transportation, when the
overall length does not exceed eighty (80) feet. When this length
is exceeded, these loads are subject to the requirements of Section
14-118 of this title;
6. For the purposes of paragraphs 1, 3, and 4 of this
subsection, the length of unitized equipment, which is defined to be
equipment so constructed and attached to a rubber-tired vehicle that
the vehicle and load become a unit and are for all practical
purposes inseparable, shall be the length of the vehicle itself, and
shall not include any protrusion of the equipment load so
constructed or attached. The equipment shall not protrude for a
distance greater than two-thirds (2/3) of the wheel base of the
vehicle, shall not impair the driver’s vision, and if less than
seven (7) feet above the roadway, shall be safely marked, flagged or
illuminated. Any such protruding structure shall be securely held
in place to prevent dropping or swaying. Unitized equipment shall
carry such safety equipment as shall be determined to be necessary
for the safety, health, and welfare of the driving public by the
Executive Director of the Department of Transportation;
7. For the purposes of paragraphs 1, 3, and 4 of this
subsection, a truck-tractor, when being towed by another vehicle
with the wheels of its steering axle raised off the roadway, shall
be considered to be a semitrailer as defined in Section 1-162 of
this title;
8. The provisions of paragraphs 1 and 3 of this subsection
shall not apply to any contractor or subcontractor, or agents or
employees of any contractor or subcontractor, while engaged in
transporting material to the site of a project being constructed by,
for, or on behalf of this state or any city, town, county, or
subdivision of this state; and
9. Special mobilized machinery, as defined in Section 1102 of
this title, which exceeds the size provisions of this section shall
only use the highways of this state by special permit issued by the
Executive Director of the Department of Transportation or an
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 6

authorized representative of the Executive Director of the
Department of Transportation. Such special permit shall be:
a. a single-trip permit issued under the provisions of
Section 14-116 of this title, or
b. a special annual oversize permit issued for one (1)
calendar year period upon payment of a fee of Ten
Dollars ($10.00) Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) plus any
amount as provided by subsection H of Section 14-118
of this title. The Department shall deposit Five
Dollars ($5.00) of each such fee collected to the
credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver
Safety Fund.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 14-103G, as
amended by Section 7, Chapter 116, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 14-103G), is amended to read as follows:
Section 14-103G. A. 1. The Department of Transportation may
issue an annual vehicle permit under the provisions of this
subsection to a specific vehicle, for the movement of oversize or
overweight loads that cannot reasonably be dismantled. Unless
otherwise provided by law, permits issued under this subsection
shall be subject to the conditions described in paragraphs 2 through
8 of this subsection.
2. Oversize or overweight loads operating under an annual
vehicle permit shall not exceed:
a. twelve (12) feet in width,
b. fourteen (14) feet in height,
c. one hundred ten (110) feet in length, or
d. one hundred twenty thousand (120,000) pounds gross
weight.
3. Oversize or overweight loads operating under an annual
vehicle permit under this subsection shall not transport a load that
has more than a twenty-five-foot front overhang, or more than a
thirty-foot rear overhang.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 7

4. The fee for an annual vehicle permit shall be Four Thousand
Dollars ($4,000.00) Five Thousand Four Hundred Forty Dollars
($5,440.00) and shall be nonrefundable. The Department shall
deposit One Thousand Four Hundred Forty Dollars ($1,440.00) of each
such fee collected to the credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access
and Driver Safety Fund.
5. The annual vehicle permit shall be issued for one (1)
calendar year period and shall commence upon the date specified on
the permit.
6. An annual vehicle permit issued pursuant to this subsection
shall be nontransferable between permittees.
7. The permitted vehicle or vehicle combination shall be
registered in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 14 of this
title for maximum weight.
8. An annual vehicle permit issued pursuant to this subsection
may be transferred from one vehicle to another vehicle in the fleet
of the permittee provided:
a. the permitted vehicle is destroyed or otherwise
becomes permanently inoperable to the extent that the
vehicle will no longer be utilized, and the permittee
presents proof to the Department of Transportation
that the negotiable certificate of title or other
qualifying documentation has been surrendered to the
Department of Transportation, or
b. the certificate of title to the permitted vehicle is
transferred to someone other than the permittee, and
the permittee presents proof to the Department of
Transportation that the negotiable certificate of
title or other qualifying documentation has been
transferred from the permittee.
9. A permit issued for loads specific to turbine blades, used
for the purpose of wind generation, may exceed a length of one
hundred ten (110) feet.
B. 1. The Department of Transportation may issue an annual
vehicle permit under this subsection to a specific motor carrier,
for the movement of oversize or overweight loads that cannot
reasonably be dismantled. An annual vehicle permit issued under
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 8

this subsection may be transferred from one vehicle to another
vehicle in the fleet of the permittee provided:
a. that no more than one vehicle is operating at a time,
and
b. the original certified permit is carried in the
vehicle that is being operated under the terms of the
permit.
2. An annual vehicle permit issued under this subsection shall
be sent to the permittee via first-class, registered mail, or at the
request and expense of the permittee via overnight delivery service.
The annual vehicle permit shall not be duplicated. The annual
vehicle permit shall be replaced only if:
a. the permittee did not receive the original permit
within seven (7) business days after the date of
issuance,
b. a request for replacement is submitted to the
Department of Transportation within ten (10) business
days after the original date of issuance of the
permit, and
c. the request for replacement is accompanied by a
notarized statement signed by a principal or officer
of the permittee acknowledging that the permittee
understands the permit may not be duplicated and that
if the original permit is located, the permittee shall
return either the original or replacement permit to
the Department of Transportation.
3. A request for replacement of an annual vehicle permit issued
pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall be denied if the
Department of Transportation can verify that the permittee received
the original annual vehicle permit.
4. Lost, misplaced, damaged, destroyed or otherwise unusable
annual vehicle permits shall not be replaced. A new permit shall be
required and shall be issued by the Department of Transportation.
C. 1. The Department of Transportation may issue an annual
fleet permit under this subsection to an electric utility, regulated
by the Corporation Commission or a rural electric cooperative solely
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 9

for the movement of poles. An annual fleet permit issued under this
subsection may be used by any vehicle in the fleet of the permittee
provided that a certified copy of the permit is carried in each
vehicle that is being operated under the terms of the permit.
2. Oversize loads operating under an annual permit issued
pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed:
a. twelve (12) feet in width,
b. fourteen (14) feet in height, or
c. fifty-five (55) feet in length.
3. The annual fee for an annual fleet permit issued pursuant to
this subsection shall be Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) Five
Thousand Two Hundred Seventy Dollars ($5,270.00) and shall be
nonrefundable. The Department shall deposit One Thousand Two
Hundred Seventy Dollars ($1,270.00) of each such fee collected to
the credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund.
4. The annual fleet permit shall be issued for a one-calendar-
year period and shall commence upon the date specified on the
permit.
5. The annual fleet permit issued under this subsection shall
be sent to the permittee via first class, registered mail, or at the
request and expense of the permittee via overnight delivery service.
The annual permit shall be replaced only if:
a. the permittee did not receive the original permit
within seven (7) business days after the date of the
issuance,
b. a request for replacement is submitted to the
Department of Transportation within ten (10) business
days after the original date of issuance of the
permit, and
c. the request for replacement is accompanied by a
notarized statement signed by an authorized person of
the permittee acknowledging that if the original
permit is located, the permittee shall either return
the original or replacement permit to the Department
of Transportation.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 10

6. A request for replacement of an annual permit issued under
the provisions of this subsection shall be denied if the Department
of Transportation can verify the permittee received the original
annual permit.
7. Lost, misplaced, damaged, destroyed or otherwise unusable
annual permits shall not be replaced. A new permit shall be
required and shall be issued by the Department of Transportation.
8. For the purposes of paragraph 5 of subsection C of Section
14-103 of this title, the term “emergency” means any permitted
movement of poles pursuant to the provisions of this subsection that
is not for new construction of electric distribution facilities.
D. 1. The Department of Transportation shall issue an annual
vehicle permit under this subsection to a transportation company or
manufacturer of portable buildings solely for the movement of
oversize portable buildings for a specific manufacturer of portable
buildings. An annual vehicle permit issued under this subsection
may not be transferred from one vehicle to another vehicle in the
fleet. The name of the manufacturer shall be on the permit and on
any portable building being moved. The original certified permit
shall be carried in the vehicle that is being operated under the
terms of the permit.
2. Oversize loads operating under an annual vehicle permit
issued pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed:
a. twelve (12) feet in width at the wall with no more
than a three-inch-eave overhang, or
b. fourteen (14) feet in height.
3. The total gross weight of oversize loads operating under an
annual vehicle permit issued pursuant to this subsection shall not
exceed forty-five thousand (45,000) pounds.
4. The tow vehicle shall be limited to two axles, and the
vehicle identification number of the vehicle shall be on the permit.
5. The fee for an annual vehicle permit issued pursuant to this
subsection shall be Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) Six Hundred Sixty
Dollars ($660.00) and shall be nonrefundable. The Department shall
deposit One Hundred Sixty Dollars ($160.00) of each such fee
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 11

collected to the credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver
Safety Fund.
6. An annual vehicle permit issued under this subsection shall
be sent to the permittee via first-class, registered mail, or at the
request and expense of the permittee via overnight delivery service.
The annual vehicle permit shall not be duplicated. The annual
vehicle permit shall be replaced only if:
a. the permittee did not receive the original permit
within seven (7) business days after the date of
issuance,
b. a request for replacement is submitted to the
Department of Transportation within ten (10) business
days after the original date of issuance of the
permit, and
c. the request for replacement is accompanied by a
notarized statement signed by a principal or officer
of the permittee acknowledging that the permittee
understands the permit may not be duplicated and that
if the original permit is located, the permittee shall
return either the original or replacement permit to
the Department of Transportation.
7. A request for replacement of an annual vehicle permit issued
pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall be denied if the
Department of Transportation can verify that the permittee received
the original annual vehicle permit.
8. A lost, misplaced, damaged, destroyed, or otherwise unusable
annual vehicle permit shall be replaced for a fee of Twenty-five
Dollars ($25.00) Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00). The Department shall
deposit Ten Dollars ($10.00) of each such fee collected to the
credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 14-109, as
amended by Section 8, Chapter 116, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 14-109), is amended to read as follows:
Section 14-109. A. On any road or highway:
1. No single axle weight shall exceed twenty thousand (20,000)
pounds; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 12

2. The total gross weight in pounds imposed thereon by a
vehicle or combination of vehicles shall not exceed the value
calculated in accordance with the Federal Bridge formula imposed by
23 U.S.C., Section 127.
B. Except as to gross limits, the formula of this section shall
not apply to a truck-tractor and dump semitrailer when used as a
combination unit. In no event shall the maximum load in pounds
carried by any set of tandem axles exceed thirty-four thousand
(34,000) pounds. Any vehicle operating with split tandem axles or
tri-axles shall adhere to the formula.
C. Except for loads moving under special permits as provided in
this title, no department or agency of this state or any county,
city, or public entity thereof shall pay for any material that
exceeds the legal weight limits moving in interstate or intrastate
commerce in excess of the legal load limits of this state.
D. 1. An annual special overload permit may be purchased for
vehicles transporting roll-off recycle metals, rock, sand, gravel,
cementitious materials, coal, flour, timber, pulpwood, and chips in
their natural state, oil field fluids, oil field equipment or
equipment used in oil and gas well drilling or exploration, and
vehicles transporting grain, fertilizer, cottonseed, cotton,
livestock, peanuts, canola, sunflowers, soybeans, feed, any other
raw agricultural products, and any other unprocessed agricultural
products, if the following conditions are met:
a. the vehicles are registered for the maximum allowable
rate,
b. the vehicles do not exceed five percent (5%) of the
gross limits set forth in subsection A of this
section,
c. the vehicles do not exceed eight percent (8%) of the
axle limits set forth in subsection A of this section,
d. no component of the vehicles exceeds the
manufacturer’s component weight rating as shown on the
vehicle certification label or tag, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 13

e. the vehicles operating pursuant to the provisions of
this paragraph will not be allowed to operate on the
National System of Interstate and Defense Highways.
2. Vehicles operating pursuant to this section must register
for the maximum allowable rate and additionally shall purchase a
nontransferable annual special overload permit from the Department
of Transportation for a fee of Three Hundred Fifty Dollars ($350.00)
Four Hundred Sixty Dollars ($460.00). All monies Three Hundred
Fifty Dollars ($350.00) of each such fee collected shall be
deposited to the credit of the Highway Construction and Maintenance
Fund. One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00) of each such fee collected
shall be deposited to the credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access
and Driver Safety Fund.
E. 1. Oversize or overweight vehicles used for specialized
transportation if the maximum weight does not exceed twenty-three
thousand (23,000) pounds on any single axle and:
a. is a dual lane trailer with dual lane axles and the
width of the transport vehicle or trailer exceeds
twelve (12) feet in width, or
b. the overall gross vehicle weight of a single trailer
meets or exceeds three hundred thousand (300,000)
pounds, originates or terminates at the Tulsa Port of
Catoosa, and the trip is confined within a thirty-mile
radius of the Port.
2. Permit fees for oversize or overweight vehicles used for
specialized transportation shall be in accordance with subsection A
of Section 14-116 of this title.
3. Vehicles operating pursuant to the provisions of this
paragraph will not be allowed to operate on the National System of
Interstate and Defense Highways.
F. Exceptions to this section will be:
1. Utility or refuse collection vehicles used by counties,
cities, or towns or by private companies contracted by counties,
cities, or towns if the following conditions are met:
a. calculation of weight for a utility or refuse
collection vehicle shall be “Gross Vehicle Weight”.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 14

The “Gross Vehicle Weight” of a utility or refuse
collection vehicle may not exceed the otherwise
applicable weight by more than fifteen percent (15%).
The weight on individual axles must not exceed the
manufacturer’s component rating which includes axle,
suspension, wheels, rims, brakes, and tires as shown
on the vehicle certification label or tag, and
b. utility or refuse collection vehicles operated under
these exceptions will not be allowed to operate on
interstate highways;
2. A combination of a wrecker or tow vehicle and another
vehicle or vehicle combination if:
a. the service provided by the wrecker or tow vehicle is
needed to remove disabled, abandoned, or accident-
damaged vehicles, and
b. the wrecker or tow vehicle is towing the other vehicle
or vehicle combination directly to the nearest
appropriate place of repair, terminal, or vehicle
storage facility;
3. A vehicle operating pursuant to the provisions of paragraph
2 of this subsection shall not be allowed to operate on the National
System of Interstate and Defense Highways unless it is a covered
heavy-duty tow and recovery vehicle that:
a. is transporting a disabled vehicle from the place
where the vehicle became disabled to the nearest
appropriate repair facility, and
b. has a gross vehicle weight that is equal to or exceeds
the gross vehicle weight of the disabled vehicle being
transported; and
4. On the interstate highway system a vehicle designed to be
used under emergency conditions to transport personnel and equipment
and to support the suppression of fires and mitigation of other
hazardous situations with a vehicle weight limit up to a maximum
gross vehicle weight of eighty-six thousand (86,000) pounds with
less than:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 15

a. twenty-four thousand (24,000) pounds on a single
steering axle,
b. thirty-three thousand five hundred (33,500) pounds on
a single drive axle,
c. sixty-two thousand (62,000) pounds on a tandem axle,
or
d. fifty-two thousand (52,000) pounds on a tandem rear
drive steer axle.
G. 1. Any vehicle utilizing an auxiliary power or idle
reduction technology unit in order to promote reduction of fuel use
and emissions because of engine idling shall be allowed an
additional four hundred (400) pounds total to the total gross weight
limits set by this section.
2. To be eligible for the exception provided in this
subsection, the operator of the vehicle must obtain written proof or
certification of the weight of the auxiliary power or idle reduction
technology unit and be able to demonstrate or certify that the idle
reduction technology is fully functional.
3. Written proof or certification of the weight of the
auxiliary power or idle reduction technology unit must be available
to law enforcement officers if the vehicle is found in violation of
applicable weight laws. The additional weight allowed cannot exceed
four hundred (400) pounds or the actual proven or certified weight
of the unit, whichever is less.
H. On the Interstate Highway System, a vehicle carrying fluid
milk products shall be considered a load that cannot be easily
dismantled or divided, or “nondivisible”.
I. Utility, refuse collection vehicles or a combination of a
wrecker or tow vehicle as described in paragraphs 1 and 2 of
subsection F of this section operating under exceptions shall
purchase an annual special overload permit from the Department of
Transportation for One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) One Hundred Thirty
Dollars ($130.00). All monies One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) of each
such fee collected shall be deposited to the credit of the Highway
Construction and Maintenance Fund. Thirty Dollars ($30.00) of each
such fee collected shall be deposited to the credit of the
Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 16

SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 14-116, as
last amended by Section 6, Chapter 171, O.S.L. 2025 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 14-116), is amended to read as follows:
Section 14-116. A. The Executive Director of the Department of
Transportation shall charge a minimum permit fee of Forty Dollars
($40.00) Fifty-five Dollars ($55.00) for any permit issued pursuant
to the provisions of Section 14-101 et seq. of this title. The
Department shall deposit Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) of each such fee
collected to the credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver
Safety Fund. In addition to the permit fee, the Executive Director
of the Department of Transportation shall charge a fee of Ten
Dollars ($10.00) Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) for each thousand pounds
in excess of the legal load limit. The Department shall deposit
Five Dollars ($5.00) of each such fee collected to the credit of the
Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund. The Executive
Director of the Department of Transportation shall establish any
necessary rules for collecting the fees.
B. The Department of Transportation is authorized to establish
an escrow account system for the payment of permit fees. Authorized
motor carriers meeting established credit requirements may
participate in the escrow account system for permits purchased from
all size and weight permit offices in this state. Carriers not
choosing to participate in the escrow account system shall be
required to make payment of the required fee or fees upon purchase
of each permit as required by law. All monies collected through the
escrow account system shall be deposited to a special account of the
Department of Transportation and placed in the custody of the State
Treasurer. Proceeds from permits purchased using the escrow account
system shall be distributed as provided for in subsection H of this
section. However, fees collected through such accounts for the
electronic transmission, transfer or delivery of permits, as
provided for in Section 14-118 of this title, shall be credited to
the Weigh Station Improvement Revolving Fund established pursuant to
Section 1167 of this title.
C. 1. Application for permits shall be made a reasonable time
in advance of the expected time of movement of such vehicles. For
emergencies affecting the health or safety of persons or a
community, permits may be issued for immediate movement.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 17

2. Size and weight permit offices in all districts where
applicable shall issue permits to authorize carriers by telephone
during weekdays.
D. No overweight permit shall be valid until all license taxes
due the State of Oklahoma have been paid.
E. No permit violation shall be deemed to have occurred when an
oversize or overweight movement is made pursuant to a permit whose
stated weight or size exceeds the actual load.
F. Any permit issued for a truck or truck-tractor operating in
combination with a trailer or a semitrailer shall contain only the
license plate number for the truck or truck-tractor if the permittee
provides to the Department of Transportation a list containing the
license plate number, and such other information as the Department
of Transportation may prescribe by rule, for each trailer or
semitrailer which may be used for movement with the permit. When
the permittee provides the list described in this subsection, the
license plate number for any trailer or semitrailer to be moved with
the permit shall not be included on the permit; provided, a trailer
or semitrailer which is not on the list shall not be authorized to
be used for movement with the permit. It shall be the
responsibility of the permittee to ensure the list provided to the
Department of Transportation is maintained and updated with any
fleet changes. The Department of Transportation shall adopt any
rules deemed necessary to administer the provisions of this
subsection.
G. The first deliverer of motor vehicles designated truck
carriers or well service carriers manufactured in Oklahoma shall not
be required to purchase an overweight permit when being delivered to
the first purchaser.
H. Except as provided in Section 14-122 of this title and
subsection A of this section, the first One Million Two Hundred
Sixteen Thousand Dollars ($1,216,000.00) of proceeds from both the
permit fees and the overweight permit fees imposed pursuant to
subsection A of this section collected monthly shall be apportioned
by Service Oklahoma as provided in Section 1104 of this title. For
the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022, and all subsequent years,
the next Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00)
of proceeds from both the permit fees and the overweight permit fees
imposed pursuant to subsection A of this section collected monthly
shall be remitted to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 18

of staffing the port of entry weigh stations with Department of
Public Safety port of entry officers whose powers and duties shall
be specified by the Department of Public Safety through the
promulgation of rules. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2017,
and all subsequent years, all proceeds collected from both the
permit fees and the overweight permit fees imposed pursuant to
subsection A of this section in excess of Three Million Seven
Hundred Sixteen Thousand Dollars ($3,716,000.00) shall be deposited
in the Weigh Station Improvement Revolving Fund as provided in
Section 1167 of this title for the purpose set forth in that section
and may be used for motor carrier permitting systems and motor
carrier safety and enforcement.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 14-118, as
amended by Section 11, Chapter 116, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 14-118), is amended to read as follows:
Section 14-118. A. 1. Pursuant to such rules as may be
prescribed by Oklahoma agencies of jurisdiction, Oklahoma motor
carriers may engage in any activity in which carriers subject to the
jurisdiction of the federal government may be authorized by federal
legislation to engage. Provided further, the Transportation
Commission shall formulate for the State Trunk Highway System,
including the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways,
and for all other highways or portions thereof, rules governing the
movement of vehicles or loads which exceed the size or weight
limitations specified by the provisions of this chapter.
2. Such rules shall be the basis for the development of a
system by the Executive Director of the Department of Transportation
for the issuance of permits for the movement of oversize or
overweight vehicles or loads. Such system shall include, but not be
limited to, provisions for duration, seasonal factors, hours of the
day or days when valid, special requirements as to flags, flagmen
and warning or safety devices and other such items as may be
consistent with the intent of this section. The permit system shall
include provisions for the collection of permit fees as well as for
the issuance of the permits by telephone, electronic transfer or
such other methods of issuance as may be deemed feasible.
3. The Department of Transportation is authorized to charge a
fee of Two Dollars ($2.00) Three Dollars ($3.00) for each permit
requested to be issued by facsimile machine or by any other means of
electronic transmission, transfer or delivery. The fee shall be in
addition to any other fee or fees assessed for the permit. The Two
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 19

Dollars ($2.00) of each such fee collected shall be deposited in the
State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Transportation and
the monies shall be expended by the Department of Transportation
solely for the purposes provided for in this chapter. One Dollar
($1.00) of each such fee collected shall be deposited to the credit
of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund.
4. It is the purpose of this section to permit the movement of
necessary overweight and oversize vehicles or loads consistent with
the following obligations:
a. protection of the motoring public from potential
traffic hazards,
b. protection of highway surfaces, structures, and
private property, and
c. provision for normal flow of traffic with a minimum of
interference.
B. The Transportation Commission shall prepare and publish a
map of this state showing by appropriate symbols the various highway
structures and bridges in terms of maximum size and weight
restrictions. This map shall be titled “Oklahoma Load Limit Map”
and shall be revised periodically to maintain a reasonably current
status and in no event shall a period of two (2) years lapse between
revisions and publication of the printed version of the Oklahoma
Load Limit Map. This map shall also be made available by the
Department of Transportation on the Internet, and in no event shall
a period of six (6) months lapse between revisions of the
information provided on the Internet. Provided, further, the
Secretary of the Department of Transportation shall prepare and
publish a map of this state showing the advantages of this state as
a marketing, warehousing and distribution network center for motor
transportation sensitive industries.
C. The Executive Director of the Department of Transportation,
or an authorized representative, shall have the authority, within
the limitations formulated under provisions of this chapter, to
issue, withhold or revoke special permits for the operation of
vehicles or combinations of vehicles or loads which exceed the size
or weight limitations of this chapter. Every such permit shall be
carried in the vehicle or combination of vehicles to which it refers
and shall be open to inspection by any law enforcement officer or
authorized agent of any authority granting such permit, and no
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 20

person shall violate any of the terms or conditions of such special
permit.
D. It shall be permissible in the transportation of empty
trucks on any road or highway to tow by use of saddlemounts, i.e.,
mounting the front wheels of one vehicle on the bed of another
leaving the rear wheels only of such towed vehicle in contact with
the roadway. One vehicle may be fullmounted on the towing or towed
vehicles engaged in any driveaway or towaway operation. No more
than three saddlemounts may be permitted in such combinations. The
towed vehicles shall be securely fastened and operated under the
applicable safety requirements of the United States Department of
Transportation and such combinations shall not exceed an overall
length of seventy-five (75) feet. Provided, a driveaway saddlemount
with fullmount vehicle transporter combination may reach an overall
length of ninety-seven (97) feet on the National Network of
Highways.
E. The Executive Director of the Department of Transportation,
upon application of any person engaged in the transportation of
forest products in the raw state, which is defined to be tree-length
logs moving from the forest directly to the mill, or upon
application of any person engaged in the hauling for hire or for
resale of round baled hay with a total outside width of eleven (11)
feet or less, shall issue an annual permit, upon payment of a fee of
Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00) each year,
authorizing the operation by such persons of such motor vehicle load
lengths and widths upon the highways of this state except on the
National System of Interstate and Defense Highways. The Department
shall deposit Ten Dollars ($10.00) of each such fee collected to the
credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund.
Provided, however, the restriction on use of the National System of
Interstate and Defense Highways shall not be applicable to persons
engaged in the hauling of round baled hay with a total outside width
of eleven (11) feet or less.
F. The Executive Director of the Department of Transportation,
upon application of any person engaged in the transportation of
overwidth or overheight equipment used in soil conservation work
with a total outside width of twelve (12) feet or less, shall issue
an annual permit, upon payment of a fee of Twenty-five Dollars
($25.00) Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00) each year, authorizing the
operation by such persons of such motor vehicle load lengths and
widths upon the highways of this state except on the National System
of Interstate and Defense Highways. The Department shall deposit
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 21

Ten Dollars ($10.00) of each such fee collected to the credit of the
Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund.
G. Farm equipment including, but not limited to, implements of
husbandry as defined in Section 1-125 of this title shall be
exempted from the requirement for special permits due to size. Such
equipment may move on any highway, except those highways which are
part of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways,
during the hours of darkness and shall be subject to the
requirements as provided in Section 12-215 of this title. In
addition to those requirements, tractors pulling machinery over
thirteen (13) feet wide must have two amber flashing warning lamps
symmetrically mounted, laterally and widely spaced as practicable,
visible from both front and rear, mounted at least thirty-nine (39)
inches high.
H. Any rubber-tired road construction vehicle including rubber-
tired truck cranes and special mobilized machinery either self-
propelled or drawn carrying no load other than component parts
safely secured to the machinery and its own weight, but which is
overweight by any provisions of this chapter, shall be authorized to
move on the highways of this state. Movement of such vehicles shall
be authorized on the National System of Interstate and Defense
Highways only by special permit secured from the Executive Director
of the Department of Transportation or an authorized representative
upon determination that the objectives of this section will be
served by such a permit and that federal weight restrictions will
not be violated. The special permit shall be:
1. A single-trip permit issued under the provisions of this
section and Section 14-116 of this title; or
2. A special annual overweight permit which shall be issued for
one calendar year period upon payment of a fee of Sixty Dollars
($60.00) Eighty-five Dollars ($85.00). The Department shall deposit
Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) of each such fee collected to the
credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund.
The weight of any such vehicle shall not exceed six hundred
fifty (650) pounds multiplied by the nominal width of the tire. The
vehicle shall be required to carry the safety equipment adjudged
necessary for the health and welfare of the driving public. If any
oversized vehicle does not come under the other limitations of the
present laws, it shall be deemed that the same shall travel only
between the hours of sunrise and sunset. The vehicle, being
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 22

overweight but of legal dimension, shall be allowed continuous
travel. The vehicles, except special mobilized machinery, shall be
exempt from the laws of this state relating to motor vehicle
registration, licensing or other fees or taxes in lieu of ad valorem
taxes.
I. 1. When such machinery has a width greater than eight and
one-half (8 1/2) feet, or a length, exclusive of load, of forty-five
(45) feet, or a height in excess of thirteen and one-half (13 1/2)
feet, then the permit may restrict movement to a fifty-mile radius
from an established operating base, and may designate highways to be
traveled, hours of travel and when flagmen may be required to
precede or follow the equipment.
2. Possession of a permit shall in no way be construed as
exempting such equipment from the authority of the Executive
Director of the Department of Transportation to restrict use of
particular highways, nor shall it exempt owners or operators of such
equipment from the responsibility for damage to highways caused by
movement of the equipment. Nothing in this subsection shall apply
to machinery used in highway construction or road material
production.
3. Upon the issuance of a special mobilized machinery driveaway
permit as provided in this subsection, special mobilized machinery
manufactured in Oklahoma shall be permitted to move upon the
highways of this state from the place of manufacture to the state
line for delivery and exclusive use outside the state, and may be
temporarily returned to Oklahoma for modification and repair, with
subsequent movement back out of the state. Special driveaway
permits for such movements shall be issued by the Executive Director
of the Department of Transportation, who may act through designated
agents, upon the payment of a fee in the amount of Fifteen Dollars
($15.00) Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each movement. The Department
shall deposit Five Dollars ($5.00) of each such fee collected to the
credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund.
4. The size of the special mobilized machinery shall not be
such as to create a safety hazard in the judgment of the Executive
Director of the Department of Transportation. Permits for such
special mobilized machinery shall specify a maximum permissible road
speed of sixty (60) miles per hour, designate safety equipment to be
carried and may exclude use of highways of the interstate system.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 23

5. When such equipment has a width greater than eight and one-
half (8 1/2) feet, or a length exclusive of load of forty-five (45)
feet, or a height in excess of thirteen and one-half (13 1/2) feet,
the permit may designate highways to be traveled, hours of travel
and when flagmen may be required to precede or follow the equipment.
6. Possession of a special driveaway permit shall in no way be
construed as exempting such equipment from the authority of the
Executive Director of the Department of Transportation to restrict
use of particular highways, nor shall it exempt the owners or
operators of such equipment from the responsibility for damage to
highways caused by the movement of such equipment.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 14-120, as
amended by Section 13, Chapter 116, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 14-120), is amended to read as follows:
Section 14-120. A. Manufactured items, with the exception of
manufactured homes as defined in Section 1102 of this title and
industrialized housing as described in subsection B of Section 14-
103A of this title, exceeding sixteen (16) feet but not exceeding
twenty-three (23) feet in width traveling:
1. From a point of manufacture in this state to a point of
delivery in this state or to a point of delivery in another state;
or
2. From a point of manufacture outside this state to a point of
delivery in this state or to a point of delivery in another state
shall be permitted, upon receipt of a special movement permit issued
under the provisions of subsection B of this section, to travel on
any state or U.S. highway in Oklahoma. Provided, however, the
Executive Director of the Department of Transportation is authorized
to allow such items in excess of twenty-three (23) feet in width to
travel on such highway if it is in the best interest of the state
and a special moving permit has been issued. Provided, further,
that no such load in excess of the limitations set forth in the
applicable United States Code shall be permitted to travel upon any
portion of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways.
B. 1. Every person desiring to transport manufactured items
pursuant to the provisions of this section shall apply to the
Department of Transportation for a special movement permit on an
application form prescribed by the Department. Upon approval of the
application by the Department of Transportation, a special movement
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 24

permit shall be issued for a fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00)
Seven Hundred Fifteen Dollars ($715.00). The Department shall
deposit Two Hundred Fifteen Dollars ($215.00) of each such fee
collected to the credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver
Safety Fund.
2. Except as provided in Section 14-122 of this title and in
paragraph 1 of this subsection, monies received from such special
movement permit fees shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the
credit of the General Revenue Fund. A permit issued pursuant to the
provisions of this subsection shall expire upon the completion of
one trip specified in subsection A of this section. The special
movement permit, and fee related thereto, shall be in addition to
the permit and fees required by Section 14-116 of this title.
C. Highway escorts shall be required for transportation of
items pursuant to the provisions of this section according to rules
and regulations prescribed by the Department of Transportation.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 14-121, as
amended by Section 16, Chapter 116, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 14-121), is amended to read as follows:
Section 14-121. A. No person shall operate a special
combination vehicle within this state without a special combination
vehicle permit for the vehicle issued by the Department of
Transportation. Such permit may be issued for operation upon
Federal Aid Interstate Highways or four-lane divided Federal Aid
Primary Highways and for access or egress between points of origin
or destination.
B. 1. The Executive Director of the Department of
Transportation shall promulgate rules for the issuance of special
combination vehicle permits and shall collect an annual fee of Two
Hundred Forty Dollars ($240.00) Three Hundred Forty-five Dollars
($345.00) for each such permit issued. The Department shall deposit
One Hundred Five Dollars ($105.00) of each such fee collected to the
credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund.
2. Except as provided in Section 14-122 of this title and in
paragraph 1 of this subsection, fees collected pursuant to this
section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be credited to
the General Revenue Fund in the State Treasury.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 25

C. For the purposes of this section, a special combination
vehicle shall consist of a truck-tractor semitrailer combination
towing two complete trailers or semitrailers. No semitrailer or
trailer used in such a combination shall have a length greater than
twenty-nine (29) feet nor shall a special combination vehicle exceed
the weight limitations imposed by Sections 14-109 and 14-116 of this
title.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1521, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 460, O.S.L. 2025 (69 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1521), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1521. A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury
a fund to be known as the “Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver
Safety Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to
fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all appropriations and
transfers made by the Legislature. All monies accruing to the
credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Department of Transportation for the purposes
authorized by subsection D of this section in amounts as authorized
by the Oklahoma Legislature. Expenditures from the fund shall be
made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. Beginning July 1, 2021, except for an amount equivalent to
the amount of revenue apportioned to the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access
and Driver Safety Fund pursuant to Section 500.4B of Title 68 and
Section 1104 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes and from other
sources apportioned to the Fund by law, there shall be apportioned
to the funds specified in this subsection from the monies that would
otherwise be apportioned to the General Revenue Fund by Section 2352
of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes from the revenues derived
pursuant to subsections A, B and E of Section 2355 of Title 68 of
the Oklahoma Statutes amounts as follows:
1. Subject to any reductions required by subsection C of this
section, there shall be apportioned to the Rebuilding Oklahoma
Access and Driver Safety Fund:
a. for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2021, and for
each fiscal year thereafter, Eighty Million Dollars
($80,000,000.00), which shall be allocated and used by
the Department of Transportation first for the purpose
of making any required payments for principal,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 26

interest or other costs of borrowing with respect to
the obligations issued pursuant to Section 341 of
Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes and after any such
required payment has been made then for the purposes
otherwise authorized by this section, plus
b. the total amount apportioned to the Rebuilding
Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund for the
preceding fiscal year which, except for the amount
prescribed by subparagraph a of this paragraph, shall
be apportioned before any other amount is apportioned
pursuant to Section 2352 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, plus
c. an additional amount that is required in order for the
total apportionment to the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access
and Driver Safety Fund from all sources, except for
the amount apportioned pursuant to Section 1 of this
act and Sections 14-103, 14-103G, 14-109, 14-116, 14-
118, 14-120, and 14-121 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, for such fiscal year to equal:
(1) Five Hundred Seventy-five Million Dollars
($575,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2021,
(2) Five Hundred Ninety Million Dollars
($590,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2022, and
(3) Six Hundred Ten Million Dollars ($610,000,000.00)
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and
for each fiscal year thereafter.
All amounts apportioned pursuant to this paragraph shall be
divided into twelve equal amounts to be apportioned each month
during the fiscal year except the amount specified in subparagraph a
of this paragraph which amount shall be allocated in its full amount
in cash not later than July 30 each year or such later date as may
be required in order for the amount to be allocated in cash; and
2. For each fiscal year after the apportionments required by
paragraph 1 of this subsection have been made:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 27

a. the next Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) shall be
apportioned to the Oklahoma Tourism and Passenger Rail
Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 325 of
Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes to be used for
capital and operating costs for the “Heartland Flyer”
rail project, and
b. the next Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) shall
be apportioned to the Public Transit Revolving Fund
created pursuant to Section 4031 of this title to be
used for purposes authorized by law other than the
purpose described by subparagraph a of this paragraph.
All amounts apportioned pursuant to this paragraph shall be
divided into twelve equal amounts to be apportioned each month
during the fiscal year.
C. In the event that the Director of the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services declares a General Revenue Fund revenue
failure pursuant to Section 34.49 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and agency allocations are reduced pursuant to the
provisions of Section 34.49 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
the amounts that would otherwise be apportioned to the ROADS Fund
by:
1. Subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this
section, only to the extent that the amount is not required for debt
service related to the obligations authorized pursuant to Section
341 of Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes, Section 350 of Title 73 of
the Oklahoma Statutes and Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 2896
of the 1st Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature;
2. Subparagraphs b and c of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this
section; and
3. Subparagraphs a and b of paragraph 2 of subsection B of this
section,
shall be reduced by a percentage equal to that required of the
General Revenue Fund appropriations to state agencies and such
reductions shall occur during the entire fiscal year and for any
month during which such reductions are required by the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services and by the same percentage as
that required of the agencies for such General Revenue Fund
appropriations.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 28

D. The Department of Transportation shall use the monies in the
Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund for:
1. The construction and maintenance of state roads, bridges and
highways;
2. The direct expenses of operating and maintaining the state
highway system, including bridges;
3. Direct expenses incurred in constructing, repairing, and
maintaining state highways, farm-to-market roads, county highways
and bridges as authorized by law;
4. Matching federal funds;
5. The purchase of materials, tools, machinery, motor vehicles,
and equipment necessary or convenient for the construction and
maintenance of the state highway system and bridges;
6. Debt service incurred prior to January 1, 2006, for Capital
Improvement Program bonds sold pursuant to Section 2001 of this
title;
7. Debt service incurred on or after July 1, 2009, with respect
to obligations authorized to be issued pursuant to Section 341 of
Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes, Section 350 of Title 73 of the
Oklahoma Statutes and Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 2896 of
the 1st Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature; and
8. For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, and
ending on or prior to June 30, 2033, Twenty Million Dollars
($20,000,000.00) per fiscal year for the construction, repair, and
maintenance of weigh stations on the state highway system.
E. From the monies allocated pursuant to the provisions of
subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section each
fiscal year, the Department of Transportation shall make payments
required for the payment of principal, interest and other costs
related to the obligations issued by the Oklahoma Capitol
Improvement Authority as authorized by Section 341 of Title 73 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, Section 350 of Title 73 of the Oklahoma
Statutes and Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 2896 of the 1st
Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature, and such payments shall be
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 29

made by the Department each fiscal year before such monies are used
for any other purpose.
SECTION 10. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 30

Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3443 Page 31